Utah statutes.
59-11-110.   Tax as lien -- Instruments issued upon payment -- Certificate
of transfer.
(1)  The tax provided for in this chapter, together with applicable interest
and penalties as provided in Sections 59-1-401 and 59-1-402, shall be and
remain a lien on the decedent's estate from the time of the death of the
decedent until paid.
(2)  Upon payment of the tax, together with applicable interest and penalties,
the commission shall issue to the personal representative a receipt reflecting
this payment, a certificate of transfer, and any other appropriate instruments
reflecting this payment.  If the property is not of sufficient value for a tax
under this chapter to be imposed, the commission upon adequate showing to that
effect shall issue a certificate of transfer and any other appropriate
instruments indicating that no tax is due.
